test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaeaenga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kǟnga: # Noun 35 'eng /est king/fin' - full paradigm
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Nom: kǟnga
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Gen: kǟnga
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Par: kängõ
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Dat: kǟngan
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Ins: kǟngaks
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Ill: kängõ
     kǟnga+N+Sg+Ela: kǟngast
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Nom: kǟngad
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Gen: kǟngad
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Par: keņgi
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Dat: kǟngadõn
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Ins: kǟngadõks
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Ill: [keņgži, kǟngiž]
     kǟnga+N+Pl+Ela: [keņgšti, kǟngist]
